Hawaii statutes.
§612-55 Grand jury counsel; compensation.
The grand jury counsel shall be compensated on a daily basis at the same rate
as per diem judges of the district court. [L 1980, c 209, §6]

Cross References

Per diem district court judges, see §604-2.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next